California statutes. Elections Code
No person whose name has been written in upon a ballot for an office at the direct primary may have his or her name placed upon the ballot as a candidate for that office for the ensuing general election unless one of the following is applicable:

(a) At that direct primary he or she received for a partisan office votes equal in number to 1 percent of all votes cast for the office at the last preceding general election at which the office was filled. In the case of an office that has not appeared on the ballot since its creation, the requisite number of votes shall equal 1 percent of the number of all votes cast for the office that had the least number of votes in the most recent general election in the jurisdiction in which the write-in candidate is
 seeking office.

(b) He or she is an independent nominee for a partisan office pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 8300).

(c) At that direct primary he or she received for a voter-nominated office the highest number of votes cast for that office or the second highest number of votes cast for that office, except as provided by subdivision (b) of Section 8142 or Section 8807.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 1, Sec. 34.   (SB 6)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Operative January 1, 2011, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8606.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person may not be a write-in candidate at the general election for a voter-nominated office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 3, Sec. 26.   (AB 1413)   Effective February 10, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Presidential Electors [8650. - 8653.]

8650.

Any group of individuals, equal in number to the number of presidential electors to which this state is entitled, who desire to be write-in candidates for presidential electors pledged to a particular candidate for President and Vice President of the United States shall file a declaration of write-in candidacy.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8651.

(a) The declaration of write-in candidacy for presidential elector shall contain the following information:

(1) Candidate’s name.

(2) Residence address.

(3) A declaration stating that the candidate is a write-in candidate for the office of presidential elector.

(4) Oath or affirmation as set forth in Section 3 of Article XX of the California Constitution.

(5) The date of the general election.

(6) The names of the candidates for President and Vice President of the United States for which the group of presidential electors are pledged.

(b) The declaration of write-in candidacy described in subdivision (a) shall be accompanied by a declaration of an individual who will serve as an alternate elector if the elector vacates the elector’s office. The accompanying declaration shall state that the individual is an alternate to the write-in candidate for the office of presidential elector and shall contain the information described in paragraphs (1), (2), (4), (5), and (6) of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 216, Sec. 14.   (SB 103)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

8652.

The declaration of write-in candidacy shall be filed with the Secretary of State no later than the 14th day prior to the general election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8653.

Only those names written on the ballot at the general election for the office of President and Vice President of the United States for which a group of presidential electors are pledged on the declaration of write-in candidacy filed pursuant to Section 8650 shall be counted as votes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Term Limits [8700. - 8700.]

8700.

(a) FEDERAL LEGISLATIVE CANDIDATES; BALLOT ACCESS. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Secretary of State, or other elections official authorized by law, shall not accept or verify the signatures on any nomination paper for any person, nor shall he or she certify or place on the list of certified candidates, nor print or cause to be printed on any ballot, ballot pamphlet, sample ballot, or ballot label the name of any person, who does either of the following:

(1) Seeks to become a candidate for a seat in the United States House of Representatives, and who, by the end of the then current term of office will have served, or but for resignation would have served, as a member of the United States House of Representatives representing any portion or district of the State of California during six or more of the previous eleven years;

(2) Seeks to become a candidate for a seat in the United States Senate, and who, by the end of the then current term of office will have served, or but for resignation would have served, as a member of the United States Senate representing the State of California during twelve or more of the previous seventeen years.

(b) “WRITE-IN” CANDIDACIES. Nothing in this section shall be construed as preventing or prohibiting any qualified voter of this state from casting a ballot for any person by writing the name of that person on the ballot, or from having such a ballot counted or tabulated, nor shall any provision of this section be construed as preventing or prohibiting any person from standing or campaigning for any elective office by means of a “write-in” campaign.

(c) CONSTRUCTION. Nothing in this section shall be construed as preventing or prohibiting the name of any person from appearing on the ballot at any direct primary or general election unless that person is specifically prohibited from doing so by the provisions of subdivision (a), and to that end, the provisions of subdivision (a) shall be strictly construed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.   Note: This section is the reenactment of Section 25003 as added on Nov. 3, 1992, by initiative Prop. 164 (The California Term Limitations Act of 1992).)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. WITHDRAWAL OF CANDIDATES:  VACANCIES  [8800. - 8811.]

8800.

Except as provided in Section 8020.5, a candidate whose declaration of candidacy has been filed for any primary election shall not withdraw as a candidate at that primary election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 355, Sec. 8.   (AB 1784)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8801.

No candidate nominated at any primary election may withdraw as a candidate at the ensuing general election except those candidates permitted to withdraw by this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8803.

(a) No vacancy on the ballot for a nonpartisan office at a general election shall be filled except if the candidate dies and that fact has been ascertained by the officer charged with the duty of printing the ballots at least 68 days before the date of the next ensuing general election.

(b) No vacancy on the ballot for a voter-nominated office at a general election shall be filled. If a candidate who is entitled to appear on the general election ballot dies, the name of that candidate shall appear on the general election ballot and any votes cast for that candidate shall be counted in determining the results of the election for that office. If the deceased candidate receives a
 majority of the votes cast for the office, he or she shall be considered elected to that office and the office shall be considered vacant at the beginning of the term for which the candidate was elected. The vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as if the candidate had died after taking office for that term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 3, Sec. 27.   (AB 1413)   Effective February 10, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8804.

Notwithstanding Sections 8803 and 8810, any candidate who has been nominated at any primary election for superior court judge in which election there were at least two other candidates and who, after the date prescribed for the filing of declaration of candidacy pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 8020) of Chapter 1 of Part 1, has been appointed to any federal or state office, may request the county elections official to have his or her name removed from the ballot of the next ensuing general election. If the request is received by the county elections official at least 68 days before the next ensuing general election, the county elections official shall remove the candidate’s name from the ballot.

If a candidate’s name is removed from the ballot pursuant to this section, the two remaining candidates who received the highest number of votes cast on all the ballots of all the voters participating in the primary election for nomination for that office of superior court judge shall be the candidates for that office at the ensuing general election, and their names as candidates for that office shall be placed on the official ballot at the ensuing election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8805.

(a) Whenever a candidate for nomination for a nonpartisan office at a primary election dies on or before the day of the election, and a sufficient number of ballots are marked as being voted for him or her to entitle him or her to nomination if he or she had lived until after the election, a vacancy exists on the general election ballot, which shall be filled in the manner provided in Section 8807 for filling a vacancy caused by the death of a candidate.

(b) Whenever a candidate for nomination for a voter-nominated office at a primary election dies on or before the day of the election, and a sufficient number of ballots are marked as being voted for him or her to entitle him or her to nomination if he or she had lived until
 after the election, the name of the deceased candidate shall appear on the general election ballot and the general election shall proceed in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 8803.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 3, Sec. 28.   (AB 1413)   Effective February 10, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8807.

If the vacancy occurs among candidates chosen at the direct primary to go on the ballot for the succeeding general election for a nonpartisan office, the name of that candidate receiving at the primary election the next highest number of votes shall appear on the ballot to fill the vacancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 3, Sec. 29.   (AB 1413)   Effective February 10, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8808.

A vacancy authorized to be filled because of the death of a candidate shall be filled, and the name of the person named to fill the vacancy shall be certified to the officer charged with the duty of printing the ballots, 68 days before the day of election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8809.

Whenever a candidate has declared a candidacy for a primary election and has not withdrawn pursuant to Section 8020.5, the candidate’s name shall be printed upon the ballot for the primary election, unless the candidate has died, and that fact has been ascertained by the officer charged with the duty of printing the ballots, at least 68 days before the day of the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 355, Sec. 9.   (AB 1784)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8810.

Whenever a candidate has been nominated at any primary election after having filed a declaration of candidacy, the name of the candidate shall be printed upon the ballot for the ensuing general election unless the candidate has died and that fact has been ascertained by the officer charged with the duty of printing the ballots, at least 68 days before the day of election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8811.

Whenever, upon the death of any candidate, the vacancy created is filled by a party committee, a certificate to that effect shall be filed with the officer with whom a declaration of candidacy for that office may be filed, and, upon payment of the filing fee applicable to the office, shall be accepted and acted upon by that officer as in the case of an original declaration certificate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. INCOME TAX RETURN DISCLOSURE REQUIREMENTS [8900. - 8903.]

8900.

The Legislature finds and declares that the State of California has a strong interest in ensuring that its voters make informed, educated choices in the voting booth. To this end, the state has mandated that extensive amounts of information be provided to voters, including county and state voter information guides. The Legislature also finds and declares that the income tax returns of candidates for Governor provide voters with essential information regarding the candidate’s potential conflicts of interest, business dealings, financial status, and charitable donations. The information in tax returns therefore helps voters to make a more informed decision. The Legislature further finds and declares that as one of the largest centers of economic
 activity in the world, the State of California has a special interest in state elected officials refraining from corrupt or self-enriching behaviors while in office. The people of California can better estimate the risks of any given candidate for Governor engaging in corruption or the appearance of corruption if they have access to candidates’ tax returns. Finally, the State of California has an interest in ensuring that any violations of statutory prohibitions on behavior such as insider trading are detected and punished. Mandated disclosure of the tax returns of candidates for Governor will enable enforcement of the laws against whichever candidates are elected to those offices. The Legislature finds and declares that compliance costs with this requirement will be trivial.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 121, Sec. 2.   (SB 27)   Effective July 30, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

8901.

For the purposes of this part, “income tax return” means any tax or information return, declaration of estimated tax, or claim for refund required by, or provided for or permitted under, the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, and that is filed on behalf of, or with respect to, any person, and any amendment or supplement thereto, including supporting schedules, attachments, or lists that are supplemental to, or part of, the return so filed. For the purposes of this part, an “income tax return” does not include transcripts from the Internal Revenue Service nor accountant notes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 880, Sec. 1.   (SB 658)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8902.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the name of a candidate for Governor shall not be printed on a ballot, unless the candidate, at least 88 days before the election or, in the case of a recall election, at least 60 days before the recall election, files with the Secretary of State copies of every income tax return the candidate filed with the Internal Revenue Service in the five most recent taxable years, in accordance with the procedure set forth in Section 8903.

(b) If the candidate has not filed the candidate’s income tax return with the Internal Revenue Service for the tax year immediately preceding the election, the candidate shall submit a copy of the income tax return to the Secretary of State within five days of filing the return with the Internal Revenue Service.

(c) The requirement in subdivision (a) does not apply to any year in which the candidate was not required to file the candidate’s income tax return with the Internal Revenue Service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 880, Sec. 2.   (SB 658)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8903.

(a) The candidate shall submit the following to the Secretary of State:

(1) (A) Two copies of each tax return required by Section 8902. One copy of each tax return shall be identical to the version submitted to the Internal Revenue Service, without redactions, and shall not be subject to disclosure pursuant to this section. One copy shall be identical to the version submitted to the Internal Revenue Service but shall be redacted pursuant to this paragraph. The tax returns shall be provided to the Secretary of State in hard-copy form not later than 5 p.m. on the 88th day prior to the
 election or, in the case of a recall election, not later than 5 p.m. on the 60th day prior to the recall election.

(B) The candidate shall redact the following information from the redacted copy of each tax return:

(i) Social security numbers.

(ii) Home address.

(iii) Telephone number.

(iv) Email address.

(v) Medical information.

(vi) Bank account numbers and routing numbers.

(vii) Internal Revenue Service personal identification number (PIN).

(C) The candidate may also redact the following information from the redacted copy of each tax return:

(i) Names of dependent minors.

(ii) Employer identification number.

(iii) Business addresses.

(iv) Preparer or accountant tax identification number, client number, address, telephone number, and email address of paid tax return preparers or accountants.

(2) A written consent form, signed by the candidate, granting the Secretary of State permission to publicly
 release a version of the candidate’s tax returns redacted pursuant to this section. The Secretary of State shall prepare a standard consent form consistent with this paragraph.

(b) The Secretary of State shall review the redacted copy of each tax return submitted by the candidate to ensure that the redactions comply with subdivision (a). If the Secretary of State determines that the candidate has redacted information other than that permitted by subdivision (a), or failed to redact information required to be redacted by subdivision (a), the Secretary of State shall notify the candidate of any deficiencies. The candidate shall submit corrected hard copies of the tax return no later than 5:00 p.m. on the 78th day prior to the
 election or, in the case of a recall election, not later than 5 p.m. on the 57th day prior to the recall election. If the corrected hard copies are not timely submitted, the candidate shall not be qualified to have their name placed on the ballot of the election.

(c) (1) At the time the Secretary of State issues the certified list of candidates for the election in accordance with Section 8120, the Secretary of State shall make the redacted copies of the tax returns available to the public on the Secretary of State’s internet website. Except as provided by paragraph (2), the Secretary of State shall make public
 the redacted copies of the tax returns submitted by the candidate pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) If the candidate is required to submit a corrected copy of a tax return pursuant to subdivision (b), the Secretary of State shall make public that corrected copy.

(3) The redacted tax returns shall be continuously posted until such time as the official canvass is completed for the election at which a candidate is elected to the office, except that the tax returns of a candidate who participated in a primary election and who
 was not nominated to participate in the general election need only be posted until the official canvass for the primary election is completed.

(4) The Secretary of State shall retain the paper copies of the submitted tax returns until the completion of the official canvass of the election at which a candidate is elected to the office. Thereafter, the paper copies of the submitted tax returns shall be destroyed as soon as practicable, unless the Secretary of State has received a court order, or a lawful written request from a state or federal governmental agency, directing
 the Secretary of State to preserve the submitted tax returns.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 880, Sec. 3.   (SB 658)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 9. MEASURES SUBMITTED TO THE VOTERS [9000. - 9611.]



CHAPTER 1. State Elections [9000. - 9096.]



  ARTICLE 1. Initiative and Referendum Petitions [9000. - 9018.]

9000.

This article applies only to initiative and referendum measures affecting the Constitution or laws of the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9001.

(a) Before the circulation of an initiative or referendum petition for signatures, the text of the proposed measure shall be submitted to the Attorney General with a written request that a circulating title and summary of the chief purpose and points of the proposed measure be prepared. The electors presenting the request shall be known as the “proponents.” The Attorney General shall preserve the written request until after the next general election.

(b) Each and every proponent of a proposed initiative measure shall, at the time of submitting the text of the proposed measure, provide both of the following:

(1) An original
 signed certification stating that “I, (insert name), declare under penalty of perjury that I am a citizen of the United States, 18 years of age or older, and a resident of (insert county), California.”

(2) Public contact information.

(c) The proponents of a proposed initiative measure, at the time of submitting the text of the proposed measure to the Attorney General, shall pay a fee to the Attorney General of two thousand dollars
 ($2,000) that shall be placed in a trust fund in the office of the Treasurer and refunded to the proponents if the measure qualifies for the ballot
 within two years from the date the summary is furnished to the proponents. If the measure does not qualify within that period, the fee shall be immediately paid into the General Fund of the state.

(d) All referenda and proposed initiative measures must be submitted to the Attorney General’s Initiative Coordinator located in the Sacramento Attorney General’s Office via U.S. Postal Service, alternative mail service, or personal delivery. Only printed documents will be accepted; facsimile or email delivery will not be accepted.

(e) The Attorney General’s office shall not deem a request for a circulating title and summary submitted until all of the requirements of this section are met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 229, Sec. 1.   (AB 1100)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

9002.

(a) Upon receipt of a request from the proponents of a proposed initiative measure for a circulating title and summary, the Attorney General shall initiate a public review process for a period of 30 days by doing all of the following:

(1) Posting the text of the proposed initiative measure on the Attorney General’s internet website.

(2) Inviting, and providing for the submission of, written public comments on the proposed initiative measure on the Attorney General’s internet website. The site shall accept written public comments for the duration of the public review period. The written public comments shall be public records,
 available for inspection upon request pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code, but shall not be displayed to the public on the Attorney General’s internet website during the public review period. The Attorney General shall transmit any written public comments received during the public review period to the proponents of the proposed initiative measure.

(b) During the public review period, the proponents of the proposed initiative measure may submit amendments to the measure that are reasonably germane to the theme, purpose, or subject of the initiative measure as originally proposed. However, amendments shall not be submitted if the initiative measure as originally proposed would not effect a substantive change in law.

(1) An
 amendment shall be submitted with a signed request by all the proponents to prepare a circulating title and summary using the amended language.

(2) An amendment shall be submitted to the Attorney General’s Initiative Coordinator located in the Attorney General’s Sacramento Office via United States Postal Service, alternative mail service, or personal delivery. Only printed documents shall be accepted; facsimile or email delivery shall not be accepted.

(3) The submission of an amendment shall not extend the period to prepare the estimate required by Section 9005.

(4) An amendment shall not be accepted more than five days after the public review period is concluded. However, a proponent shall not be prohibited from
 proposing a new initiative measure and requesting that a circulating title and summary be prepared for that measure pursuant to Section 9001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 96.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

9003.

In the event that the Attorney General is a proponent of a proposed measure, the circulating title and summary of the chief purpose and points of the proposed measure, including an estimate or opinion on the financial impact of the measure, shall be prepared by the Legislative Counsel, and the other duties of the Attorney General specified in this chapter with respect to the circulating title and ballot title and summary and an estimate of the financial effect of the measure shall be performed by the Legislative Counsel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 373, Sec. 9.   (AB 753)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

9004.

(a) Upon receipt of the text of a proposed initiative measure, and after the public review period provided for in Section 9002, the Attorney General shall prepare a circulating title and summary of the chief purposes and points of the proposed measure. The circulating title and summary shall not exceed 100 words. The Attorney General shall also provide a unique numeric identifier for each proposed initiative measure. The circulating title and summary shall be prepared in the manner provided for the preparation of ballot titles and summaries in Article 5 (commencing with Section 9050), the provisions of which, in regard to the preparation, filing, and settlement of ballot titles and summaries, are applicable to the circulating title and summary.

(b) The Attorney General shall provide a copy of the circulating title and summary and its unique numeric identifier to the proponents and to the Secretary of State within 15 days after receipt of the fiscal estimate or opinion prepared by the Department of Finance and the Legislative Analyst pursuant to Section 9005. The date the copy is delivered or mailed to the proponents is the “official summary date.”

(c) Upon receipt of the circulating title and summary from the Attorney General, the Secretary of State shall, within one business day, notify the proponents and county elections official of each county of the official summary date and provide a copy of the circulating title and summary to each county elections official. This notification shall also include a complete schedule showing the maximum filing deadline, and the certification deadline by the counties to the Secretary of
 State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 697, Sec. 6.   (SB 1253)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

9005.

(a) The Attorney General, in preparing a circulating title and summary for a proposed initiative measure, shall, in boldface print, include in the circulating title and summary either the estimate of the amount of any increase or decrease in revenues or costs to the state or local government, or an opinion as to whether or not a substantial net change in state or local finances would result if the proposed initiative is adopted.

(b) The estimate as required by this section shall be made jointly by the Department of Finance and the Legislative Analyst, who shall deliver the estimate to the Attorney General so that he or she may include the estimate in the circulating title and summary prepared by him or her.

(c) The estimate shall be delivered to the Attorney General within 50 days of the date of receipt of the proposed initiative measure by the Attorney General, unless, in the opinion of both the Department of Finance and the Legislative Analyst, a reasonable estimate of the net impact of the proposed initiative measure cannot be prepared within the 50-day period. In the latter case, the Department of Finance and the Legislative Analyst shall, within the 50-day period, give the Attorney General their opinion as to whether or not a substantial net change in state or local finances would result if the proposed initiative measure is adopted.

(d) A statement of fiscal impact prepared by the Legislative Analyst pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 12172 of the Government Code may be used by the Department of Finance and the Legislative Analyst in the preparation of the fiscal estimate or
 the opinion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 697, Sec. 7.   (SB 1253)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

9006.

(a) Upon receipt of the text of a proposed referendum, the Attorney General shall prepare a circulating title and summary of the chief purpose and points of the proposed statute at issue. The circulating title and summary shall not exceed a total of 100 words. No fiscal analysis shall be included.

(b) The Attorney General shall provide a copy of the circulating title and summary of the proposed referendum to the proponents and to the Secretary of State within 10 days after receipt of the proposed referendum.

(c) Upon receipt of the circulating title and summary from the Attorney General, the Secretary of State shall, within one business day, notify the proponents and county elections
 official of each county of the official summary date and provide a copy of the circulating title and summary to each county elections official. This notification shall also include a complete schedule showing the maximum filing deadline, and the certification deadline by the counties to the Secretary of State.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 373, Sec. 13.   (AB 753)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

9007.

Immediately upon the preparation of the circulating title and summary of a proposed initiative or referendum measure, the Attorney General shall forthwith transmit copies of the text of the measure and the circulating title and summary to the Senate and the Assembly. The appropriate committees of each house may hold public hearings on the subject of the measure. However, nothing in this section shall be construed as authority for the Legislature to alter the measure or prevent it from appearing on the ballot.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 373, Sec. 14.   (AB 753)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

9008.

Every proposed initiative measure, prior to circulation, shall have placed across the top of the petition in 11-point or larger roman type, all of the following:

(a) The Attorney General’s unique numeric identifier placed before the circulating title and summary upon each page where the circulating title and summary is to appear.

(b) The circulating title and summary prepared by the Attorney General upon each page of the petition on which signatures are to appear. The circulating title shall appear in all capital letters.

(c) The circulating title and summary prepared by the Attorney General
 upon each section of the petition preceding the text of the measure.

(d) The circulating title and summary prepared by the Attorney General as required by subdivision (b) shall be preceded by the following statement: “INITIATIVE MEASURE TO BE SUBMITTED DIRECTLY TO THE VOTERS.”, followed by, on a separate line, “The Attorney General of California has prepared the following circulating title and summary of the chief purpose and points of the proposed measure:”. This text shall be in boldface.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 887, Sec. 4.   (SB 1360)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9009.

The heading of an initiative petition shall be in substantially the following form:

Initiative Measure to Be Submitted Directly to the Voters

The Attorney General of California has prepared the following circulating title and summary of the chief purpose and points of the proposed measure:

(Here set forth the unique numeric identifier provided by the Attorney General and circulating title and summary prepared by the Attorney General. Both the Attorney General’s unique numeric identifier and the circulating title and summary must also be printed across the top of each page of the petition whereon signatures are to appear.)

To the Honorable Secretary of State of
 California

We, the undersigned, registered, qualified voters of California, residents of ____ County (or City and County), hereby propose amendments to the Constitution of California (the ____ Code, relating to ____) and petition the Secretary of State to submit the same to the voters of California for their adoption or rejection at the next succeeding general election or at any special statewide election held prior to that general election or as otherwise provided by law. The proposed constitutional (or statutory) amendments (full title and text of the measure) read as follows:

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 373, Sec. 17.   (AB 753)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

9010.

Across the top of each page of a referendum petition, there shall be printed in 12-point boldface type the following:

“Referendum Against an Act Passed by the Legislature.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9011.

Across the top of each page after the first page of every referendum petition or section of a referendum petition, which is prepared and circulated, there shall be printed in 18-point gothic type a short title, in 20 words or less, showing the nature of the petition and the subject to which it relates.

A space at least one inch wide shall be left blank at the top of each page and after each name, for the use of the county elections official, in verifying the petition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9012.

Any petition for a proposed initiative measure or referendum may be presented in sections, but each section shall contain a full and correct copy of the circulating title and summary and text of the proposed measure. The text of the proposed measure shall be printed in type not smaller than 8 point.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 373, Sec. 19.   (AB 753)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

9013.

A space at least one inch wide shall be left blank across the top of each page of every initiative and referendum petition and after the name of each voter who has signed the petition for the use of the county elections official in verifying the petition.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 373, Sec. 21.   (AB 753)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

9014.

(a) A petition for a proposed initiative or referendum measure shall not be circulated for signatures prior to the official summary date.

(b) Subject to subdivision (d), a petition with signatures for a proposed initiative measure shall be filed with the county elections official not later than 180 days from the official summary date, and a county elections official shall not accept a petition for the proposed initiative measure after that period.

(c) Subject to subdivision (d), a petition for a proposed referendum measure shall be filed with the county elections official not later than 90 days from the date the legislative bill was chaptered by the Secretary
 of State, and a county elections official shall not accept a petition for the proposed referendum measure after that period.

(d) If the last day to file a petition pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) is a holiday, as defined in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the petition may be filed with the county elections official on the next business day.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 106, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2014, Ch. 697, Sec. 8.   (SB 1253)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

9015.

Officers required by law to receive or file in their offices any initiative or referendum petition shall not receive or file any initiative or referendum petition not in conformity with this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 373, Sec. 25.   (AB 753)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

9016.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 324, for purposes of subdivision (c) of Section 8 of, and subdivision (c) of Section 9 of, Article II of the California Constitution, “general election” means only the election held throughout the state on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of each even-numbered year with respect to an initiative or referendum measure that is certified for the ballot on or after July 1, 2011.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an initiative measure shall not be submitted to the voters at a statewide special election held less than 131 days after the date the measure is certified for the ballot.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 558, Sec. 1.   (SB 202)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

9017.

If, for any reason, any initiative or referendum measure proposed by petition as provided by this article is not submitted to the voters at the next succeeding statewide election, that failure shall not prevent its submission at a succeeding statewide election.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 373, Sec. 27.   (AB 753)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

9018.

The Secretary of State shall prepare and provide to any person, upon request, a pamphlet describing the procedures and requirements for preparing and circulating a statewide initiative measure and for filing sections of the petition, and describing the procedure used in determining and verifying the number of qualified voters who have signed the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 373, Sec. 28.   (AB 753)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Petition Signatures [9020. - 9022.]

9020.

(a) The petition sections shall be designed so that each signer shall personally affix all of the following:

(1) The signer’s signature.

(2) The signer’s printed name.

(3) The signer’s residence address, giving street and number, or if no street or number exists, adequate designation of residence so that the location may be readily ascertained. An incomplete or inaccurate apartment or unit number in the signer’s residence address shall not invalidate their signature pursuant to Section 105.

(4) The name of
 the signer’s incorporated city or unincorporated community.
